src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VI11-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite - Spleách

+Len:bhí		#;		
+1P+Sg+Len:bhíos	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph+Len:bhíos-sa	#;
+2P+Sg+Len:bhís	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+Len:bhíse	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+Len:bhís-se	#;
+1P+Pl+Len:bhíomar	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:bhíomarna	#;
+3P+Pl+Len:bhíodar	#;			! O SIADHAIL LEARNING IRISH p32
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len:bhíodarsan	#;		
+Auto+Len:bhíothas	#;		

LEXICON VI11-FutInd			! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:beidh		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+CM:bead	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph+CM:beadsa	NegQ;
+2P+Sg+CM:beir	NegQ;
+2P+Sg+Emph+CM:beirse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:beimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beimidne	NegQ;
+3P+Pl+CM:beid	NegQ;
+3P+Pl+Emph+CM:beidse	NegQ;
+Auto:beifear	NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:bheas	#;			! relative: a bheas

LEXICON VI11-PastImp		! Past Imperfect - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite

0:bíodh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:bínn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:bínnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:bíteá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:bíteása	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:bímis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:bímisne	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:bídís	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:bídís-sean	NegQ2;
+Auto:bítí	NegQ2;
+Rel+Len:bhíos	#;			! relative: a bhíos

LEXICON VI11-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

+CM:beadh	#;		! e.g. ná beadh
0:beadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:beinn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:beinnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:beifeá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:beifeása	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:beimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beimisne	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:beidís	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:beidís-sean	NegQ2;
+Auto:beifí 	NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI11-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:raibh			NegSubj;
+Var:rabh			NegSubj;	! (Added CW 09/08)
+1P+Pl:rabhaimid	NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:rabhaimidne	NegSubj;
+Auto:rabhthar	 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI11-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:beinn	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:beinnse	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:beifeá	NegQ;
+2P+Sg+Emph:beifeása	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:beadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:beimis	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beimisne	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:beadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:beidís	NegQ;
+3P+Pl+Emph:beidís-sean	NegQ;
+Auto:beití	NegQ;		

LEXICON VI11-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordatáeach

+1P+Sg:bím	NegImper;
+1P+Sg+Emph:bímse	#;
+2P+Sg:bí	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:bíodh	NegImper;
+1P+Pl:bímis	NegImper;
+1P+Pl+Emph:bímisne	#;
+2P+Pl:bígí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:bídís	NegImper;
+3P+Pl+Emph:bídís-sean	#;
+Auto:bítear	NegImper;

!**************************************************************************

LEXICON VI12	! IS (Copula)

! PRESENT / FUTURE

!In principal (independant) clauses

+Cop+Pres:is				#;
+Cop+Pres+Pron:sea			#;	! is ea
+Cop+Pres+Pron:seadh			#;	! is ea
+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:sé	#;	! is é
+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc+Art+Sg+Def:sén	#;	! is é an (Hartmann) 
+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc+Art+Sg+Def+Subst+Noun+Sg:séard	#;	! is é an rud (Hartmann) 
+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Fem:sí	#;	! is í
+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Pl:siad		#;	! is iad
+Cop+Pres+Neg:ní			#;
+Cop+Pres+Neg:Ní			#;	! needed to compete with Part Pat and Part Vb Neg
+Cop+Pres+Q:an				#;
+Cop+Pres+NegQ:nach			#;

+Cop+PresSubj:gura			#;
+Cop+PresSubj+VF:gurab		#;
+Cop+PresSubj+Neg:nára		#;
+Cop+PresSubj+Neg+VF:nárab	#;

!In dependant clauses

+Cop+Pres+Dep:gur			#;
+Cop+Pres+Dep+VF:gurb		#;
+Cop+Pres+Dep+Q:an			#;
+Cop+Pres+Dep:ar			#;
+Cop+Pres+Dep+Neg:nach		#;
+Cop+Pres+Dep+NegQ:nach		#;

!In relative clauses

+Cop+Pres+RelInd:ar			#;
+Cop+Pres+RelInd+VF:arbh		#;
+Cop+Pres+RelInd+VF:darbh		#;
+Cop+Pres+RelInd+VF:arb		#;
+Cop+Pres+RelInd+VF:darb		#;
+Cop+Pres+RelInd+Neg:nach	#;
+Cop+Pres+Rel:is			#;
+Cop+Pres+Rel+Neg:nach		#;

!================================

! PAST / CONDITIONAL

!In principal (independant) clauses
+Cop+Cond:ba				#;	!!!!SHOULD ADD ALL OTHERS TOO
+Cop+Past:ba				#;
+Cop+Past+VF:b'				#;
+Cop+Cond+VF:b'				#;
+Cop+Past+Ecl:mba			#;
+Cop+Cond+Ecl:mba			#;
+Cop+Past+Ecl+VF:mb'			#;
+Cop+Cond+Ecl+VF:mb'			#;
+Cop+Past+Neg:níor			#;
+Cop+Past+Neg+VF:níorbh		#;
+Cop+Past+Q:ar				#;
+Cop+Past+Q+VF:arbh			#;
+Cop+Past+NegQ:nár			#;
+Cop+Past+NegQ+VF:nárbh		#;

!In dependant clauses

+Cop+Past+Dep:gur				#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+VF:gurbh			#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Neg:nár			#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Neg+VF:nárbh		#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Q:ar				#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Q+VF:arbh			#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Neg+Q:nár			#;
+Cop+Past+Dep+Neg+Q+VF:nárbh		#;

!In relative clauses

+Cop+Past+Rel:ba				#;
+Cop+Past+Rel+VF:ab				#;
+Cop+Past+Rel+Neg:nár			#;
+Cop+Past+Rel+Neg+VF:nárbh		#;
+Cop+Past+RelInd:ar				#;
+Cop+Past+RelInd+VF:arbh			#;
+Cop+Past+RelInd+Neg:nár		#;
+Cop+Past+RelInd+Neg+VF:nárbh	#;

!************************************************************************************
!**************************************************************************
! Mixed Verb Stems
 
LEXICON VerbsB
fliuch+Verb+VTI:fliuch	V1-BR;	! gsm ~ wet; rainy
agóid+Verb+VI+Vow:agóid	V1-SL;	! objection, protest, lucht ~e
preab+Verb+VI:preab	V1-BR;	! start; bounce; throb; liveliness;
ruaig+Verb+VT:ruaig	V1-SL;	! pl ~eanna chase, rout;
conspóid+Verb+VTI:conspóid	V1-SL;	! argument; controversy vt &
pléasc+Verb+VTI:pléasc	V1-BR;	! pl ~anna explosion; bang,
scread+Verb+VI:scread	V1-BR;	! pl ~anna scream vi
stóráil+Verb+VT:stóráil	V1-SL-LC;	! storage vt store
bog+Verb+VTI:bog	V1-BR;	! soft part, etc, ~
dearg+Verb+VTI:dearg	V1-BR;	! npl ~a red; rouge,
tolg+Verb+VTI:tolg	V1-BR;	! attack; force; gap, rent
scaoil+Verb+VTI:scaoil	V1-SL;	! loose(n), release; unfasten, slacken;
síl+Verb+VTI:síl	V1-SL;	! think, consider; intend
cúngaigh+Verb+VTI:cúngaigh	V2-BR;	! narrow, restrict, cúngú ar
méadaigh+Verb+VTI:méadaigh	V2-BR;	! increase, multiply; enlarge; grow

feith+Verb:feith		V1-SL;
cúnaigh+Verb:cúnaigh		V2-BR;
dámh+Verb:dámh		V1-BR;
díbh+Verb:díbh		V1-BR;
díolaim+Verb:díolaim		V2-SL;
díospóid+Verb:díospóid	V1-SL;
eisiacht+Verb+Vow:eisiacht	V1-BR;
fionraigh+Verb:fionraigh	V2-BR;
fortaigh+Verb:fortaigh	V2-BR;
glan+Verb:glan		V1-BR;
taifigh+Verb:taifigh		V2-SL;
táinsigh+Verb:táinsigh	V2-SL;
tairngrir+Verb:tairngr	V2-SL-sync; 	! NEED TO ADD CC or FIX
tochsail+Verb:tochsl	V2-BR-sync;	! "
